North Carolina statutes. Chapter 136. Transportation.
Article 20. North Carolina State Ports Authority.
§ 136-274.
Liberal construction of Article.

It is intended that the provisions of this Article shall be liberally construed to accomplish the purposes provided for, or intended to be provided for, herein, and where strict construction would result in the defeat of the accomplishment of any of the acts authorized herein, and a liberal construction would permit or assist in the accomplishment thereof, the liberal construction shall be chosen.

History.

1945, c. 1097, s. 13; 1977, c. 198, s. 9; 2011-145, s. 14.6(b).

§ 136-275.
Warehouses, wharves, etc., on property abutting navigable waters.

The powers, authority and jurisdiction granted to the North Carolina State Ports Authority under this Article and Chapter shall not be construed so as to prevent other persons, firms and corporations, including municipalities, from owning, constructing, leasing, managing and operating warehouses, structures and other improvements on property owned, leased or under the control of such other persons, firms and corporations abutting upon and adjacent to navigable waters and streams in this State, nor to prevent such other persons, firms and corporations from constructing, owning, leasing and operating in connection therewith wharves, docks and piers, nor to prevent such other persons, firms and corporations from encumbering, leasing, selling, conveying or otherwise dealing with and disposing of such properties, facilities, lands and improvements after such construction.

History.

1955, c. 727; 1977, c. 198, s. 9; 2011-145, s. 14.6(b).

§ 136-276.
Usage contracts.

A usage contract entered into between the Authority and a carrier is not a public record within the meaning of

G.S. 132-1

. For purposes of this section, the term “usage contract” means a contract or agreement that contains terms and conditions involving terminal services related to maritime activities, including dockage, wharfage, cargo handling, storage, ro-ro service, transportation drayage, and other miscellaneous port services.

History.

2015-142, s. 1.

§ 136-280.
Annual report.

Beginning October 1, 2021, and annually thereafter, the North Carolina State Ports Authority (Authority) shall submit to the Joint Legislative Transportation Oversight Committee and the Fiscal Research Division a report on funds appropriated to the Authority from the Highway Fund and Highway Trust Fund. The report shall include the following:

Total funds appropriated to the Authority since the 2015-2016 fiscal year through the end of the prior fiscal year, total appropriations spent by fiscal year, planned spending of any remaining unspent appropriations, and a breakdown of amount spent and planned to spend by project with a description of each project. Project description shall include how each project relates to the goals of the Authority outlined in the Authority’s Strategic Plan.

Allocations of total funds appropriated for the current fiscal year, including a breakdown of amount of planned spending by project with a description of each project. Project description shall include how each project relates to the goals of the Authority outlined in the Authority’s Strategic Plan.

Progress on metrics and goals outlined in the Authority’s Strategic Plan.

History.

2021-180, s. 41.54(a).

Editor's Note.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 43.8, made this section, as added by Session Laws 2021-180, s. 41.54(a), effective July 1, 2021.

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 41.54(b), provides: “Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section, the initial annual report on the Authority is due no later than March 30, 2022.”

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations Appropriations Act of 2021.’”

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 43.5, provides: “Except for statutory changes or other provisions that clearly indicate an intention to have effects beyond the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium, the textual provisions of this act apply only to funds appropriated for, and activities occurring during, the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium.”

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 43.7, is a severability clause.